Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2501
Definitions.

In this article

(1) Local administration means administration by a personal representative appointed in this state pursuant to appointment proceedings described in Article 24.

(2) Local personal representative includes any personal representative appointed in this state pursuant to appointment proceedings described in Article 24 and excludes foreign personal representatives who acquire the power of a local personal representative pursuant to section 30-2506.

(3) Resident creditor means a person domiciled in, or doing business in this state, who is, or could be, a claimant against an estate of a nonresident decedent.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 207, UPC § 4-101.